Maryland, session 2025, HB1461.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
5–213.
(a) Each fiscal year, the State shall distribute the State share of the foundation
program to each county board.
(c) [(1)] Each county board shall distribute to the local workforce development
board for the county the following amount multiplied by the enrollment count in the county:
[(i)] (1) For fiscal year 2024, $62; and
[(ii)] (2) For [each of fiscal years 2025 and 2026] FISCAL YEAR
2025, the prior fiscal year amount increased by the inflation adjustment.
[(2) The funds distributed under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be
used to support the Career Counseling Program for Middle and High School Students
established under § 7–126 of this article that is provided collaboratively by the workforce
development board, the school, any other relevant State or local agencies, and employers.
(3) On or before June 30, 2024, and in each of the next 2 fiscal years, the
local workforce development board, in collaboration with the county board and any other
relevant State or local agencies, shall report to the Accountability and Implementation
Board established under Subtitle 4 of this title on the use of the funds and the impact of
the funds on providing career counseling.]
5–234.
(a) (1) Except as provided by paragraph (2) of this subsection and subsections
(e) and (f) of this section, for each of the following programs, “minimum school funding”
means at least 75% of the per pupil amount applicable to each of the following programs:
(i) The foundation program under § 5–213 of this subtitle;

HOUSE BILL 1461 3
(ii) The compensatory education program under § 5–222 of this
subtitle;
(iii) The English learner education program under § 5–224 of this
subtitle;
(iv) The special education program under § 5–225 of this subtitle;
(v) Public providers of prekindergarten under § 5–229 of this
subtitle;
(vi) Transitional supplemental instruction under § 5–226 of this
subtitle;
(vii) The comparable wage index grant under § 5–216 of this subtitle;
and
(viii) The college and career readiness program under § 5–217 of this
subtitle.
(2) Except as provided by subsection (e) of this section, for each of the
following programs, “minimum school funding” means 100% of the per pupil amount
applicable to each of the following programs:
(i) Private providers of prekindergarten under § 5–229 of this
subtitle; and
(ii) The per pupil grant under the concentration of poverty program
under § 5–223 of this subtitle.
(b) (1) For each school, the county board shall distribute the minimum school
funding amount for the applicable program multiplied by the school enrollment for the
applicable program.
(2) On or before July 1, 2024, for fiscal year 2025, and each July 1
thereafter, each county board shall report on the county board’s compliance with this
section to the Department and the Accountability and Implementation Board established
under Subtitle 4 of this title.
(3) A county board may request a waiver under § 5–406 of this title from
this provision for reasons including:
(i) A significant shift in total school–level enrollment between the
prior year and the current year;
(ii) A significant shift in school–level enrollment of at–promise
students between the prior year and the current year; [and]

HOUSE BILL 1461
(iii) A significant difference in the amount of funding provided
through the formula and the amount of expenditures necessary for a category of at–promise
students; AND
(IV) IF A SCHOOL HAS 350 OR FEWER TOTAL STUDENTS.
(f) For the purposes of this section, subsection [(a)(1)(iv)] (A)(1) of this section
may be reported in the aggregate for each [county] SCHOOL.
5–402.
(a) Beginning on July 1, 2020, and continuing until June 30, 2032, there is an
Accountability and Implementation Board.
(h) (1) The Board is not intended to usurp or abrogate:
(i) The operational authority of the Department, the Governor’s
Workforce Development Board, the Maryland Higher Education Commission, the
Department of Commerce, or the Maryland Department of Labor; or
(ii) The day–to–day decision making of county boards, local
superintendents, institutions of higher education, or other stakeholders with a role to play
in the implementation of the Blueprint for Maryland’s Future.
(2) (I) The Board may not usurp or abrogate the lawful collective
bargaining process due educators and others in the State.
(II) ANY TERM OR CONDITION RELATING TO THE EMPLOYMENT
OF SCHOOL PERSONNEL THAT IS SUBJECT TO THE COLLECTIVE BARGAINING
PROCESS UNDER TITLE 6, SUBTITLE 4 OR 5 OF THIS ARTICLE SHALL CONTINUE TO
BE COVERED BY THE COLLECTIVE BARGAINING PROCESS AND IS NOT UNDER THE
BOARD’S AUTHORITY, UNLESS IT IS SPECIFICALLY ENUMERATED AS PART OF THE
CAREER LADDER ESTABLISHED UNDER TITLE 6, SUBTITLE 10 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(3) (i) The Board shall have plenary authority over all matters within
its jurisdiction under this subtitle, including the intended outcomes of the Blueprint for
Maryland’s Future.
(ii) [In] SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, IN
the event of a conflict between a decision or policy of the Board and the decision or policy of
another entity on a matter within the Board’s jurisdiction, the Board’s decision or policy
shall control.
6–1001.

HOUSE BILL 1461 5
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(e) (1) “Teacher” means a certified public school employee who is primarily
responsible and accountable for teaching the students in the class.
(2) “Teacher” does not include, unless otherwise provided:
(i) Curriculum specialists;
(ii) Instructional aides;
(iii) Attendance personnel;
(IV) PRINCIPALS;
(V) ASSISTANT PRINCIPALS;
[(iv)] (VI) Psychologists;
[(v)] (VII) Social workers;
[(vi)] (VIII) Clerical personnel;
[(vii)] (IX) An individual with a Resident Teacher Certificate; or
[(viii)] (X) An individual with a certification for career professionals.
6–1002.
(a) (1) On or before July 1, 2024, each county board shall implement a career
ladder that meets the requirements of this subtitle.
(b) (1) There is a career ladder for educators in the State.
(e) The guiding principles for development of the career ladder are:
(1) Progression of teachers in a manner that incentivizes teachers to stay
on the teacher track [rather than moving to the administrator track];
(2) A teacher salary that attracts new teachers to the profession;
(3) A teacher salary that incentivizes existing teachers to opt in to the
career ladder;
(4) Teacher salary progression as performance increases as demonstrated
by a teacher achieving NBC; and

HOUSE BILL 1461
(5) Incentives that are successful in all local school systems.
(f) The levels of the career ladder are as follows:
(3) Level three is:
(i) An NBC teacher; OR
(ii) If there is no assessment comparable to NBC for the teacher’s
subject area, a teacher with a master’s degree in the teacher’s subject area[; or
(iii) An assistant principal]; and
(4) Level four is[:
(i) A] A teacher on the teacher leadership track, in the following
tiers:
[1.] (I) Lead Teacher;
[2.] (II) Distinguished Teacher; or
[3.] (III) Professor Distinguished Teacher[; or
(ii) A teacher on the administrator track, in the following tiers:
1. Licensed Principal; or
2. Distinguished Principal].
(i) The percentage of teachers who are Professor Distinguished Teachers [or
Distinguished Principals] may not be more than 1% of the total number of all teachers.
6–1003.
[(a)] Beginning with teachers listed under § 6–1002(h)(3) of this subtitle, as
specified by the State Board, a teacher on level one, two, or three of the career ladder shall:
(1) Teach in the classroom on average 60% of the teacher’s working time;
and
(2) Spend the remaining time on other teacher activities, including:
(i) Improving instruction;

HOUSE BILL 1461 7
(ii) Identifying, working with, and tutoring students who need
additional help;
(iii) Working with the most challenging students;
(iv) Working with students living in concentrated poverty; and
(v) Leading or participating in professional learning.
[(b) (1) An assistant principal is on level three of the career ladder and shall:
(i) Be an NBC teacher; or
(ii) Have an advanced professional certificate for administration.
(2) Beginning with teachers listed under § 6–1002(h)(3) of this subtitle, as
specified by the State Board, an assistant principal shall:
(i) Participate in classroom activity involving direct interactions
with students for at least 20% of their working hours; and
(ii) Spend a portion of the remaining time on other teacher related
activities, including:
1. Setting priorities for the subject level departments or
grade levels of the school; and
2. Fulfilling specialized roles, such as head of professional
development.
(3) The requirements of paragraph (2) of this subsection may not be
construed to require that an assistant principal be designated as a teacher of record.]
[6–1006.
(a) (1) There is an administrator track on level four of the career ladder.
(2) The primary purpose of the administrator track is to develop teachers
into principals.
(3) A teacher on the administrator track is responsible for managing
administrative functions in the school.
(b) (1) The first tier of the administrator track is a licensed principal.

HOUSE BILL 1461
(2) (i) The State Board, in consultation with the Professional Standards
and Teacher Education Board, shall establish the criteria that a teacher shall meet to
achieve the licensed principal tier.
(ii) The criteria under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph:
1. Except as provided in subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph
and beginning on July 1, 2029, shall include a requirement that a teacher be an NBC
teacher before the teacher may be a licensed principal; and
2. May include a requirement that a teacher shall complete
an induction or training program for new principals.
(iii) The State Board, in consultation with the Professional Standards
and Teacher Education Board, shall establish a process through which an individual may
receive a waiver to serve as a licensed principal if the individual:
1. Is not an NBC teacher; but
2. Meets other qualifying criteria, as determined by the State
Board, in consultation with the Professional Standards and Education Board.
(3) Beginning with teachers listed under § 6–1002(h)(3) of this subtitle as
specified by the State Board, a licensed principal is encouraged to teach in the classroom
for at least 10% of the principal’s working hours.
(4) (i) When a licensed principal position becomes available in the
county, a licensed principal shall be selected in accordance with this paragraph.
(ii) Throughout the process of selecting a licensed principal under
this paragraph, priority shall be given to teachers who have experience teaching in schools
that:
1. Reflect the racial and ethnic diversity of the State; or
2. Have received a grant under § 5–223 of this article.
(iii) Teacher leaders, other licensed principals, and distinguished
principals in the county shall provide a list of qualified candidates to the local
superintendent.
(iv) The local superintendent shall appoint a candidate from the list
provided under subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph.
(c) (1) The second tier of the administrator track is distinguished principal.

HOUSE BILL 1461 9
(2) To be a distinguished principal, a teacher shall demonstrate the ability
to:
(i) Effectively identify, attract, lead, and retain highly professional
teachers;
(ii) Organize and manage a school in a way that incentivizes and
supports teachers to do their best work;
(iii) Set high standards for faculty and students and achieve the
standards set by others;
(iv) Work with stakeholders on the teacher’s vision;
(v) Identify and help cultivate a teacher’s potential for growth;
(vi) Help students, parents, and teachers embrace the goal for all
students to achieve internationally competitive standards;
(vii) Mentor and support other principals; and
(viii) Help other principals achieve higher levels of performance.
(3) Beginning with teachers listed under § 6–1002(h)(3) of this subtitle as
specified by the State Board, a distinguished principal is encouraged to teach in a classroom
for at least 10% of the principal’s working hours.
(4) (i) When a distinguished principal position becomes available in the
county, a distinguished principal shall be selected in accordance with this paragraph.
(ii) Throughout the process of selecting a distinguished principal
under this paragraph, priority shall be given to licensed principals who have experience
teaching and serving as principals in schools that:
1. Reflect the racial and ethnic diversity of the State; or
2. Have received a grant under § 5–223 of this article.
(iii) Teacher leaders and other distinguished principals in the county
shall provide a list of qualified candidates to the local superintendent.
(iv) The local superintendent shall appoint a candidate from the list
provided under subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph.
(d) All licensed and distinguished principals shall:

HOUSE BILL 1461
(1) Be trained in and demonstrate capability with racial awareness and
cultural competence, including:
(i) Teaching students and managing teaching faculty from different
racial, ethnic, and socioeconomic backgrounds; and
(ii) Implementing restorative practices;
(2) Cultivate a school environment in which teachers:
(i) Develop cultural competence;
(ii) Enhance empathy and respect for students;
(iii) Work to eliminate biases and stereotypes; and
(iv) Provide instruction in a manner that assumes that all students
regardless of their race, ethnicity, gender, or other characteristics are capable of the highest
levels of academic achievement; and
(3) Be evaluated on their success in fostering the school environment in
item (2) of this subsection.
(e) A county board may add a tier to the administrator track for district office
directors.]
6–1007.
(e) A teacher may move from [one track of] the career ladder [to a different track]
INTO THE ADMINISTRATION with the approval of the principal of the school in which they
teach.
6–1009.
(a) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, beginning on July 1, 2022,
teacher salary increases associated with the career ladder shall at a minimum include the
following:
(i) Becoming an NBC teacher – $10,000 salary increase;
(ii) An NBC teacher teaching at a low–performing school as
identified by the county board – $7,000 salary increase;
(iii) Becoming lead teacher – $5,000 salary increase;
(iv) Becoming distinguished teacher – $10,000 salary increase; AND

HOUSE BILL 1461 11
(v) Becoming professor distinguished teacher – $15,000 salary
increase[; and
(vi) Becoming a distinguished principal – $15,000 salary increase].
(2) (I) The teacher salary increases under paragraph (1) of this
subsection do not apply to paragraph (1)(iii) through [(vi)] (V) of this subsection until §
6–1002(a) of this subtitle becomes effective as recommended by the Department and
approved by the Accountability and Implementation Board.
(II) THE TEACHER SALARY INCREASES UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)
OF THIS SUBSECTION DO NOT APPLY TO A PRINCIPAL OR AN ASSISTANT PRINCIPAL.
(b) (1) Salary increases associated with maintenance of an NBC are subject to
collective bargaining in accordance with § 6–408 of this title.
(2) The State share for the following salary increases provided under
paragraph (1) of this subsection shall not exceed the following amounts:
(i) Earning a first maintenance of NBC – [$8,000] $4,000 salary
increase;
(ii) Earning a second maintenance of NBC – [$7,000] $4,000 salary
increase; and
(iii) Earning a third maintenance of NBC – [$6,000] $3,000 salary
increase.
6–1012.
(a) In this section, “nonclassroom [teacher”] EDUCATOR” means a position in a
school for which, if the individual earns NBC, the individual is eligible to join the career
ladder, including:
(1) Administrators;
(2) Assistant principals;
(3) Instructional specialists; and
(4) Principals.
(b) (1) Except as provided under paragraph (2) of this subsection, each teacher
or nonclassroom [teacher] EDUCATOR who pursues NBC shall receive from the State an
amount equal to the National Board for Professional Teaching Standards fees associated
with the initial completion and renewal of NBC.

HOUSE BILL 1461
(2) Each teacher and nonclassroom [teacher] EDUCATOR may only receive
payment under this subsection for one retake of each assessment on the National Board for
Professional Teaching Standards.
(c) Each county shall pay to the State one–third of the cost for each teacher or
nonclassroom [teacher] EDUCATOR who receives funds under subsection (b) of this section
to pursue NBC.
(d) (1) A teacher or a nonclassroom [teacher] EDUCATOR who does not
complete all the requirements for assessment by the National Board for Professional
Teaching Standards shall reimburse the State the full amount of the funds received under
subsection (b) of this section.
(2) The State shall reimburse the county the amount received under
subsection (c) of this section on receipt of the reimbursement from a teacher or
nonclassroom [teacher] EDUCATOR under paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(3) The provisions of paragraph (1) of this subsection do not apply to a
teacher or nonclassroom [teacher] EDUCATOR who completes all the requirements for
assessment by the National Board for Professional Teaching Standards but does not obtain
NBC.
[7–127.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “CTE Committee” means the Career and Technical Education
Committee established under § 21–207 of this article.
(3) “Local career counseling agreement” means a memorandum of
understanding between a county board, a local workforce development board, a community
college, and, if appropriate, an American Job Center to provide career counseling services.
(4) “Program” means the Career Counseling Program for Middle and High
School Students.
(b) (1) There is a Career Counseling Program for Middle and High School
Students.
(2) The purpose of the Program is to provide each middle school and high
school student in the county with individualized career counseling services.
(c) (1) Each county board shall enter into a local career counseling agreement
with the local workforce development board, the community college that serves the county,
and, if appropriate, an American Job Center.

HOUSE BILL 1461 13
(2) Counseling provided under the local career counseling agreement shall
help each student choose one or more post–college and career readiness pathways under §
7–205.1 of this title.
(d) Funding received by the county board for career counseling under Subtitle 2
of this title shall be spent in accordance with the agreement.
(e) The CTE Committee shall conduct an evaluation of each local career
counseling agreement for best practices and disseminate its findings to all county boards,
local workforce development boards, community colleges, and if appropriate, American Job
Centers in the State.]
7–1A–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(k) “Tier I child” means a child:
(1) Who is 3 or 4 years old;
(2) (i) Whose family income is less than or equal to 300% of the federal
poverty level; [or]
(ii) Who is a homeless youth;
(III) WHO HAS A DISABILITY; OR
(IV) WHO IS FROM A HOME IN WHICH ENGLISH IS NOT THE
PRIMARY SPOKEN LANGUAGE; and
(3) Whose family chooses to enroll the child in full–day prekindergarten.
7–1A–06.
(d) Priority in expanding prekindergarten slots shall be provided to 3– and 4–year
olds who are[:
(1)] Tier I children[;
(2) Children with disabilities, regardless of income; or
(3) Children from homes in which English is not the primary spoken
language].
7–205.1.

HOUSE BILL 1461
(a) In this section, “CCR standard” means the college and career readiness
standards established under this section.
(g) (1) Subject to [paragraph] PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (4) of this subsection,
[beginning in the 2023–2024 school year,] each county board shall provide all students who
meet the CCR standard required under subsection (c) of this section with access to the
following post college and career readiness (post–CCR) pathways, at no cost to the student
or the student’s parents, including the cost of any fees:
(i) A competitive entry college preparatory program, chosen by the
county board, consisting of:
1. The International Baccalaureate Diploma Program;
2. The Cambridge AICE Diploma Program; or
3. A comparable program consisting of Advanced Placement
courses specified by the College Board;
(ii) A program that allows a student, through an early college
program or dual enrollment at a student’s high school and an institution of higher
education to earn:
1. An associate degree; or
2. At least 60 credits toward a bachelor’s degree; and
(iii) A robust set of career and technology education programs that
are recommended by the CTE Skills Standards Advisory Committee and approved by the
CTE Committee and that allow students to complete:
1. A credit or noncredit certificate or license program, course,
or sequence of courses, including a program, course, or courses taken through dual
enrollment under § 15–127 of this article, at a secondary or postsecondary institution,
through an Advanced Placement course at a secondary institution, or through an
apprenticeship sponsor that leads to an industry recognized occupational–credential or
postsecondary certificate;
2. A registered apprenticeship program approved by the
Division of Workforce Development and Adult Learning within the Maryland Department
of Labor; or
3. A youth apprenticeship program, under Title 18, Subtitle
18 of this article.

HOUSE BILL 1461 15
(2) (I) [Each] SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, EACH public high school shall provide access to the programs described
under paragraph (1) of this subsection through that public school or through another public
school in the county.
(II) 1. EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 2 OF
THIS SUBPARAGRAPH, A COUNTY BOARD MAY DEVELOP AND ESTABLISH INCOME
ELIGIBILITY GUIDELINES AND PROCEDURES FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS FOR THE
POST–CCR PATHWAY UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(I) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
2. A STUDENT WITH A FAMILY INCOME THAT MEETS
ELIGIBILITY GUIDELINES TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL FREE AND REDUCED PRICE
MEALS SHALL BE PROVIDED ACCESS TO THE POST–CCR PATHWAY UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1)(I) OF THIS SUBSECTION AT NO COST TO THE STUDENT OR THE
STUDENT’S PARENTS.
(3) (i) Each student who meets the CCR standard required under
subsection (c) of this section shall be enrolled in at least one post–CCR pathway described
in paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(ii) Each student who enrolls in a post–CCR pathway shall remain
enrolled in the student’s public high school.
(iii) Each public high school shall provide to every student, regardless
of whether the student is enrolled in a post–CCR pathway, the full range of services to
which the student is entitled, including:
1. Personal, career, and academic advising; and
2. Counseling, in accordance with § 7–126 of this title, to help
the student choose one or more post–CCR pathways, or courses within a post–CCR
pathway, that fits with the student’s educational and career goals.
(iv) Priority for counseling and advising services described under
subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph shall be given to students who have not met the CCR
standard by the end of 10th grade.
(v) Any high school graduation requirements that a student does not
meet by the time the student has completed the assessment required under subsection (d)
of this section shall be provided within the post–CCR pathway the student chooses.
(4) To phase in expansion of dual enrollment to maximize the number of
students who can earn the maximum number of dual enrollment credits consistent with
the phased increases in school funding, for fiscal years 2025 through 2027, the State Board
and the Accountability and Implementation Board, in consultation with each local school
system, may limit the number and types of courses that a student dually enrolled at the

HOUSE BILL 1461
student’s public high school and at an institution of higher education may enroll in during
the school year at the institution of higher education as part of the post–CCR pathway in
accordance with paragraph (1) of this subsection and § 15–127 of this article.
(5) (i) The State Board shall adopt regulations to carry out this
subsection.
(ii) The regulations shall include standards that:
1. Guarantee, to the extent practicable, statewide uniformity
in the quality of the post–CCR pathways;
2. Meet the requirements of paragraph (1) of this subsection;
and
3. Require high school graduation credit to be awarded for
any programs administered in accordance with this subsection.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That it is the intent of the General
Assembly that there be an appropriate balance of shared and new costs between county
boards of education and community colleges for students who are dually enrolled in public
secondary schools and community colleges in the State.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The Accountability and Implementation Board shall study the effect of
National Board Certification on teachers in the State.
(b) The study required under subsection (a) of this section shall include:
(1) an analysis of whether teachers who have earned National Board
Certification produce greater student achievement outcomes compared to other similarly
situated teachers;
(2) information on the race, ethnicity, gender, and age of teachers who have
obtained National Board Certification compared to the total population of teachers; and
(3) the feasibility of using additional, comparable teacher achievements
associated with student achievement and available to teachers of every background.
(c) On or before January 1, 2026, the Board shall report the results of its study to
the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the
General Assembly.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:

HOUSE BILL 1461 17
(a) The State Department of Education shall conduct an adequacy study on
Maryland’s special education funding.
(b) The adequacy study required under subsection (a) of this section shall
examine and make recommendations on:
(1) the adequacy of the foundation program as a mechanism to prevent
inappropriate referrals to special education and to narrow achievement gaps between
students with disabilities and their peers of the same age;
(2) whether a formula that uses multiple weights for special education
funding based on a student’s disability or a student’s needed level of support and services
is feasible;
(3) whether the requirement that schools receive “minimum school
funding” under § 5–234 of the Education Article is a feasible method of ensuring that
students with disabilities receive adequate funding;
(4) how the timing of funding disbursements aligns with the needs of
students with disabilities throughout the school year;
(5) the cost of student transportation and whether it is accurately reflected
in the funding formula; and
(6) the costs of nonpublic school placements for students with disabilities
and how the State and local cost–sharing formula works for these students.
(c) (1) The Department may contract with a public or private entity to conduct
the adequacy study.
(2) If the Department chooses to contract with a public or private entity,
the Department must do so on or before July 1, 2026.
(d) On or before December 1, 2027, the Department shall report on the results of
the adequacy study to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 1 of this Act shall be
construed to apply only prospectively and may not be applied or interpreted to have any
effect on or application to any public school employee contracts agreed to before the effective
date of this Act.
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.